apertium-nog.nog.lexc
LEXICON V-NONFIN-REG-NEG

%<ger%>:%>%{u%}%{ь%}в SUBST ;  ! FIXME: Will overgenerate
%<ger_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н SUBST ; ! FIXME: Will overgenerate
%<ger1%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} SUBST ; ! FIXME: Will overgenerate
%<ger_pros%>:%>%{A%}%{Я%}к SUBST ; ! FIXME: Might not be correct categorisation / Will overgenerate
%<ger_impf%>:%>%{E%}таган SUBST ; ! FIXME: Will overgenerate

%<prc_cond%>:%>с%{A%} V-PERS-S2 ; 
%<prc_impf%>:%>%{E%} CLIT ;

%<gna_cond%>:%>с%{A%} CLIT ;

%<gpr_past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н # ;
%<gpr_impf%>:%>%{E%}таган # ;

%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: CLIT ;

%<opt%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{A%}й%{I%}м CLIT ;
%<opt%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}н CLIT ;

LEXICON V-COMMON

V-FIN-REG-NEG ; 
%<neg%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-FIN-REG-NEG ; 

V-FIN-IRREG-NEG ; 

V-NONFIN-REG-NEG ; 
%<neg%>:%>%{M%}%{A%} V-NONFIN-REG-NEG ;

V-NONFIN-IRREG-NEG ; 

LEXICON V-DER

%<coop%>:%>%{I%}с V-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-IV 

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON ; 
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-DER ; 

LEXICON V-TV-NOPASS

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER ; 

LEXICON V-TV-PASS

%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>: V-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-TV

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-DER ; 
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-COMMON ;

LEXICON PRON-MEN

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ен # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:еним # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ага # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ени # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:енде # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:еннен # ;

LEXICON PRON-SEN

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ен # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:енинъ # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ага # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ени # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:енде # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:еннен # ;

LEXICON PRON-OL

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:л # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:нынъ # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:га # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:ны # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:нда # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:ннан # ;

LEXICON PRON-BIZ 

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:им # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ге # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ди # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:де # ;

LEXICON PRON-SIZ 

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:инъ # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:ге # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:ди # ;
%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:де # ;

LEXICON PRON-OLAR 

%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>: CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-BU

бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:бу CLIT ;
бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:мунынъ CLIT ;
бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:буга CLIT ;
бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:муны CLIT ;
бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:мунда CLIT ;
бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:мундан CLIT ;
бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:булар CASES-ETC ;
бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:мундай CLIT ; ! Dir/LR
бу%<prn%>%<dem%>%<adv%>:булай CLIT ;  

LEXICON PRON-DEM-SOL

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:л CLIT ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:нынъ CLIT ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:нга CLIT ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:га CLIT ; ! Dir/LR ! FIXME
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:ны CLIT ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:нда CLIT ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:ннан CLIT ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:лар CASES-ETC ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:ндай CLIT ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-MUNAV  ! FIXME: This is a bit of a mess

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:в CLIT ; 
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:вга CLIT ; 
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:лар CASES-ETC ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:дай CLIT ; ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:вдай CLIT ; 

LEXICON PRON-ITG-QAJSY

%<prn%>%<itg%>%<nom%>: CLIT ; 

LEXICON PRON-ITG 

%<prn%>%<itg%>: SUBST ; ! FIXME

LEXICON PRON-NEG

%<prn%>%<neg%>: SUBST ; ! FIXME

LEXICON PRON-QNT-BERI

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: CASES ; 

LEXICON PRON-QNT 

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: SUBST ; ! FIXME

LEXICON PRON-REF-PX

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м CASES-ETC ; 
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}нъ CASES-ETC ; 
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ; 
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}з CASES-ETC ; 
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}нъ%{I%}з CASES-ETC ; 
%<px3pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ; 

LEXICON PRON-REF

%<prn%>%<ref%>: PRON-REF-PX ;

LEXICON PRON-RECIP

%<prn%>%<recip%>: SUBST ; ! FIXME

LEXICON NUM-COMMON

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON NUM-ROMAN

%<num%>%<ord%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM-ITG ! This is a temporal solution
                ! (could be integrated with the above)

%<num%>%<itg%>: # ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нш%{I%} N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON NUM

NUM-COMMON ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нш%{I%} # ;             ! FIXME: base form, <det> reading
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нш%{I%} N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON DET-DEM

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-REF

%<det%>%<ref%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-QNT

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-ITG

%<det%>%<itg%>: # ;


LEXICON CA

%<cnjadv%>: # ; 

LEXICON CC

%<cnjcoo%>: # ; 

LEXICON CS

%<cnjsub%>: # ; 

LEXICON KI

%<attr%>:%>%{G%}%{I%} CLIT ;

LEXICON ADV1 
! Normal adverb, takes substantivisation, e.g.
!                      attribution, e.g.
!                      adverbial, e.g.

%<adv%>: # ; 
%<adv%>%<subst%>: SUBST ; 

LEXICON ADV2
! Adverb also a noun, as above + noun reading 
! (e.g. for languages 'ногайша')

N1;
ADV1 ; 

LEXICON ADV3
! Interrogative adverb

%<adv%>%<itg%>: # ; 

LEXICON ADV4
! -KI adverb, takes -KI but nothing else

ADV5 ; 
%<adv%>: KI ; 

LEXICON ADV5 ! Pure adverbial

%<adv%>: # ; 

LEXICON ADV6
! Normal adverb + -KI
 
%<adv%>: # ; 
%<adv%>: KI ; 
%<adv%>%<subst%>: SUBST ; 

LEXICON POST 

%<post%>: # ; 

LEXICON POSTADV

%<postadv%>: # ; 


LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Miscellaneous 

ша%<emph%>:ша # ; ! "же, ведь"
ди%<ind%>:%~ди # ; ! "то" ! Dir/RL
ди%<ind%>:ди # ; ! "то" ! Dir/LR
ди%<ind%>:ти # ; ! "то" ! Dir/LR
ди%<ind%>:ды # ; ! "то" ! Dir/LR
ди%<ind%>:ты # ; ! "то" ! Dir/LR

LEXICON Copula 

э%<cop%>%<ger_past%>:экен SUBST ; ! FIXME: Warning: will overgenerate
э%<cop%>%<past%>:экен V-PERS-S1 ;
э%<cop%>%<ifi%>:э%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;

LEXICON Postadverbs 

ок:ок POSTADV ; ! ""

LEXICON Postpositions

уьшин:уьшин POST ; ! "because of"
карап:карап POST ; ! ""
баслап:баслап POST ; ! ""
бербетин:бербетин POST ; ! ""
дейим:дейим POST ; ! ""
дери:дери POST ; ! ""
сайын:сайын POST ; ! ""
бойынша:бойынша POST ; ! ""
карсы:карсы POST ; ! ""
тийисли:тийисли POST ; ! ""
шаклы:шаклы POST ; ! "столько" FIXME
бери:бери POST ; ! ""
кадер:кадер POST ; ! "до"

ман:%~ман POST ; ! "" ! Dir/RL
ман:мен POST ; ! "" Dir/LR
ман:ман POST ; ! "" Dir/LR
ман:пен POST ; ! "" Dir/LR
ман:пан POST ; ! "" Dir/LR
ман:бен POST ; ! "" Dir/LR
ман:бан POST ; ! "" Dir/LR

LEXICON Conjunctions 

да:%~да CC ; ! "" Dir/RL
да:да CC ; ! ""       Dir/LR
да:де CC ; ! ""       Dir/LR
да:та CC ; ! ""       Dir/LR
да:те CC ; ! ""       Dir/LR

не:не CC ; ! "neither... , nor ... (x2)" ! FIXME:NOTE: disambig
тек:тек CC ; ! "но"
я:я CC ; ! "или"
яде:яде CC ; ! ""
ама:ама CC ; ! "но"
эм:эм CC ; ! "и"

солай% ок:солай% ок CC ; ! "(kaz) сондай-ақ"

эгер:эгер CS ; ! "если"

солайша:солайша CA ; ! "постольку"
коьре:коьре CA ; ! "постольку"
соьйтип:соьйтип CA ; ! "итак"
солай% этип:солай% этип CA ; ! "итак"

LEXICON Pronouns 

мен:м PRON-MEN ; ! "я"
сен:с PRON-SEN ; ! "ты"
ол:о PRON-OL ;  ! "он; она; оно"
биз:биз PRON-BIZ ; ! "мы"
сиз:сиз PRON-SIZ ; ! "вы"
олар:олар PRON-OLAR ; ! "они"

PRON-DEM-BU ; ! ""

ол:о PRON-DEM-SOL ; ! ""
сол:со PRON-DEM-SOL ; ! ""
мунав:муна PRON-DEM-MUNAV ; ! ""

ким:ким PRON-ITG ; ! "кто"
не:не PRON-ITG ; ! "что"
кайсы:кайсы PRON-ITG-QAJSY ; ! ""

еш% ким:еш% ким PRON-NEG ; ! ""

баьри:баьри PRON-QNT-BERI ; ! ""

бирев:бирев PRON-QNT ; ! ""
буьтин:буьтин PRON-QNT ; ! "весь"

бир%-бир:бир%-бир PRON-RECIP ; ! "each other, one another"

оьз:оьз PRON-REF ; ! "self"

LEXICON Verbs 
кел%<v%>%<iv%>%<prt_impf%>%+ят%<vaux%>:келеят V-COMMON ;  ! Dir/LR
бол:бол V-IV ; ! "быть"
тур:тур V-IV ; ! ""
ят:ят V-IV ; ! ""
кой:кой V-TV ; ! ""
шык:шык V-IV ; ! ""
йибер:йибер V-TV ; ! ""
ул:ул V-IV ; ! "быть, забывать"
кел:кел V-IV ; ! ""
де:де V-TV ; ! ""
соьйле:соьйле V-TV ; ! ""
ал:ал V-TV ; ! ""
эт:эт V-TV ; ! ""
яша:яша V-IV ; ! "жить"
тув:тув V-IV ; ! "восходить"
шыг:шыг V-IV ; ! "восходить"
сора:сора V-TV ; ! "просить"
сакла:сакла V-TV ; ! "защищать"
оьт:оьт V-TV ; ! "проникать"
озгар:озгар V-TV ; ! ""
яз:яз V-TV ; ! "писать"
белгиле:белгиле V-TV ; ! "" FIXME
тапшыр:тапшыр V-TV ; ! ""
карат:карат V-TV ; ! "лечить"
басла:басла V-TV ; ! "начать"
буьги:буьги V-TV ; ! "ломить"
окы:окы V-TV ; ! "почитать"
ойла:ойла V-TV ; ! "полагать"
туьз:туьз V-TV ; ! "составить"
кет:кет V-IV ; ! "отъехать"
оз:оз V-TV ; ! "" FIXME
шакыр:шакыр V-TV ; ! "позвать"
оьлтир:оьлтир V-TV ; ! "убивать" (caus)
каш:каш V-IV ; ! "run, flee"
ашув:ашув V-TV ; ! "открыть"
аькел:аькел V-TV ; ! "bring"
юр:юр%{e%} V-IV ; ! "ходить"
элте:элте V-TV ; ! "carry"
билдир:билдир V-TV ; ! "announce" (caus)
кос:кос V-TV ; ! "join"
буз:буз V-TV ; ! "destroy"
айыр:айыр V-TV ; ! "separate"
боьл:боьл V-TV ; ! "separate, stop"
кесекле:кесекле V-TV ; ! "divide"
токтат:токтат V-TV ; ! "stop"
сындыр:сындыр V-TV ; ! "break" (caus)
иш:иш V-TV ; ! "пить"
кир:кир V-TV ; ! "входить"
битир:битир V-TV ; ! "кончать"
кутар:кутар V-TV ; ! "кончать"
оьстир:оьстир V-TV ; ! "plant"
сал:сал V-TV ; ! "put"
сат:сат V-TV ; ! "sell"
тасла:тасла V-TV ; ! "betray"
таб:таб V-TV ; ! "найти"
тоьбелес:тоьбелес V-TV ; ! "fight"
токалас:токалас V-TV ; ! "fight"
согыс:согыс V-TV ; ! "fight"
тут:тут V-TV ; ! "hold"
кур:кур V-TV ; ! "составить"
кала:кала V-TV ; ! "составить"
туьс:туьс V-IV ; ! ""
шеш:шеш V-TV ; ! ""
исле:исле V-TV ; ! ""
сайла:сайла V-TV ; ! "choose"
кайт:кайт V-IV ; ! "вернуться"
кайт:кайт%{e%} V-TV ; ! "делать как"
кал:кал V-IV ; ! "stay, remain"
сан:сан V-TV ; ! "думать"
эсит:эсит V-TV ; ! "слушать"
куллан:куллан V-TV ; ! "применить"
тарт:тарт V-TV ; ! "pull"
бегит:бегит V-TV ; ! "крепить"
беркит:беркит V-TV ; ! "крепить"
йолыгыс:йолыгыс V-IV ; ! "" FIXME
коьрис:коьрис V-IV ; ! "" FIXME
куьрес:куьрес V-TV ; ! "бороться" FIXME
етекшиле:етекшиле V-IV ; ! "" FIXME
авыр:авыр V-IV ; ! "" FIXME
оьрлен:оьрлен V-IV ; ! "" FIXME
анълат:анълат V-TV ; ! "explain"
анъла:анъла V-TV ; ! "понимать"
шаш:шаш V-TV ; ! "sow"
юрит:юрит V-TV ; ! "lead"
оьткер:оьткер V-TV ; ! "продеть"
шалысыпкара:шалысыпкара V-TV ; ! ""
кызыксын:кызыксын V-TV ; ! "" FIXME
канагатла:канагатла V-TV ; ! "serve"
катнас:катнас V-TV ; ! "участвовать"
уйгынла:уйгынла V-TV ; ! "организовать"
ата:ата V-TV ; ! "звать"
айт:айт V-TV ; ! "звать"
аьрекетле:аьрекетле V-TV ; ! "действовать"
шыгар:шыгар V-TV ; ! "выводить"
тамамла:тамамла V-TV ; ! "обобщить"
бар:бар V-IV ; ! ""
азай:азай V-IV ; ! ""
бил:бил V-TV ; ! ""
боьлис:боьлис V-IV ; ! ""
коьрсет:коьрсет V-TV ; ! "show"
яра:яра V-TV ; ! ""нравиться" FIXME
макуллас:макуллас V-TV ; ! "" FIXME
кес:кес V-TV ; ! "chop"
кара:кара V-TV ; ! "смотреть"
янъылыс:янъылыс V-IV ; ! "ошибаться"
оьлше:оьлше V-TV ; ! "мерить"
сана:сана V-TV ; ! ""
сен:сен V-IV ; ! ""
суьй:суьй V-TV ; ! ""
оьл:оьл V-IV ; ! "губнить"
билимлен:билимлен V-IV ; ! ""
билимлендир:билимлендир V-TV ; ! "" (caus)
кабыл% ал:кабыл% ал V-TV ; ! ""
ийгилендир:ийгилендир V-TV ; ! "" (caus)
казан:казан V-TV ; ! "получать"
туьрлен:туьрлен V-IV ; ! ""
шал:шал V-TV ; ! "косить"
суьйт:суьйт V-TV ; ! "" FIXME
кий:кий V-TV ; ! ""
корк:корк V-IV ; ! ""
изле:изле V-TV ; ! ""
йыла:йыла V-IV ; ! ""
тап:тап V-TV ; ! ""
бийле:бийле V-IV ; ! ""
тол:тол V-IV ; ! ""
орынлас:орынлас V-IV ; ! ""
айлан:айлан V-IV ; ! ""
яй:яй V-TV ; ! ""
коьр:коьрин V-TV-PASS ; ! "be seen"
коьр:коьр V-TV-NOPASS ; ! "видить"
оьс:оьс V-TV ; ! ""
куьлемсире:куьлемсире V-IV ; ! ""
олтыр:олтыр V-IV ; ! ""
бас:бас V-TV ; ! ""
суьйин:суьйин V-IV ; ! ""
бакыр:бакыр V-TV ; ! ""
тий:тий V-IV ; ! ""
тынъла:тынъла V-TV ; ! ""
шоршы:шоршы V-IV ; ! ""
уса:уса V-IV ; ! "походить"
мут:мут V-IV ; ! "забывать"
саьатле:саьатле V-IV ; ! "делить на часы"
ясал:ясал V-IV ; ! "делаться"
куьл:куьл V-IV ; ! "смеяться
куьле:куьле V-IV ; ! "смеяться
уш:уш V-IV ; ! ""
аш:аш V-TV ; ! "открывать"
йырла:йырла V-TV ; ! "петь"
кыз:кыз V-IV ; ! "нагреваться"
токтал:токтал V-IV ; ! "останливаться"
